Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.160

Leases on tidelands—Assessment.

All leases of tidelands owned in fee by the state are declared to be real property for the purpose of assessment for the payment of the cost of local improvements.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.160. Prior: 1911 c 98 s 56; RRS s 9409.]